test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-biena_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - biena: # N_ODD_OPEN (nom.sg. with open final syllable)
    biena+N+Sg+Nom: biena
    biena+N+Sg+Gen: biednaga
    biena+N+Sg+Acc: biednagav
    biena+N+Sg+Ill: biednagij
    biena+N+Sg+Ine: biednagin
    biena+N+Sg+Ela: [biednagist, biednagis]
    biena+N+Sg+Com: biednagijn
    biena+N+Pl+Nom: biednaga
    biena+N+Pl+Gen: biednagij
    biena+N+Pl+Acc: biednagijt
    biena+N+Pl+Ill: biednagijda
    biena+N+Pl+Ine: biednagijn
    biena+N+Pl+Ela: [biednagijst, biednagijs]
    biena+N+Pl+Com: [biednagij, biednagijgum]
    biena+N+Ess: biednagin
    biena+N+Abe: biednagahtá

 
    biena+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: biednagatj
    biena+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen: biednagatja
    biena+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc: biednagatjav
    biena+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill: biednagatjij
    biena+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ine: biednagatjin
    biena+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ela: [biednagatjist, biednagatjis]
    biena+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com: biednagatjijn
    biena+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom: biednagatja
    biena+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen: biednagatjij
    biena+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc: biednagatjijt
    biena+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill: biednagatjijda
    biena+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ine: biednagatjijn
    biena+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ela: [biednagatjijst, biednagatjijs]
    biena+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com: [biednagatjij, biednagatjijgum]
    biena+N+Der/Dimin+N+Ess: biednagatjin
 
